Missouri, session 2026, HB2930.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 166.705, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 166.705, to read as follows:
166.705. 1. A parent of a qualified student may establish a Missouri empowerment
scholarship account for the student by entering into a written agreement with an educational
assistance organization. The agreement shall provide that:
(1) The qualified student shall enroll in a qualified school and receive an education in
at least the subjects of English language arts, mathematics, social studies, and science;
(2) Except for a qualified student who is in the custody of the state, the qualified
student shall not be enrolled in a public school operated by, or a charter school located within,
the qualified student's district of residence and shall release the district of residence from all
obligations to educate the qualified student while the qualified student is enrolled in the
program. This subdivision shall not be construed to relieve the student's district of residence
from the obligation to conduct an evaluation for disabilities;
(3) The qualified student shall receive a grant, in the form of moneys deposited in
accordance with section 135.714, in the qualified student's Missouri empowerment
scholarship account;
(4) The moneys deposited in the qualified student's Missouri empowerment
scholarship account shall be used only for the following expenses of the qualified student:
(a) Tuition or fees at a qualified school;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2930 2
(b) Textbooks required by a qualified school;
(c) Educational therapies or services from a licensed or accredited practitioner or
provider including, but not limited to, licensed or accredited paraprofessionals or educational
aides;
(d) Tutoring services;
(e) Curriculum;
(f) Tuition or fees for a private virtual school;
(g) Fees for a nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement test, advanced
placement examinations, international baccalaureate examinations, or any examinations
related to college or university admission;
(h) Fees for management of the Missouri empowerment scholarship account by firms
selected by the educational assistance organization;
(i) Services provided by a public school including, but not limited to, individual
classes and extracurricular programs;
(j) Computer hardware or other technological devices that are used to help meet the
qualified student's educational needs and that are approved by an educational assistance
organization;
(k) Fees for summer education programs and specialized after-school education
programs;
(l) Transportation costs for mileage to and from a qualified school; and
(5) Moneys deposited in the qualified student's Missouri empowerment scholarship
account shall not be used for the following:
(a) Consumable educational supplies including, but not limited to, paper, pens,
pencils, or markers;
(b) Tuition at a private school located outside of the state of Missouri; and
(c) Payments or reimbursements to any person related within the third degree of
consanguinity or affinity to a qualified student.
2. Missouri empowerment scholarship accounts are renewable on an annual basis
upon request of the parent of a qualified student. Notwithstanding any changes to the
qualified student's multidisciplinary evaluation team plan, a student who has previously
qualified for a Missouri empowerment scholarship account shall remain eligible to apply for
renewal until the student completes high school and submits scores to the state treasurer from
a nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement test, advanced placement
examination, international baccalaureate examination, or any examination related to college
or university admission purchased with Missouri empowerment scholarship account funds.
When applying for renewal, the student shall provide proof that the student remains a
member of a household whose total annual income does not exceed an amount equal to

HB 2930 3
three hundred percent of the income standard used to qualify for free and reduced price
lunches. If a student exceeds such income amount, the student shall be ineligible for the
upcoming school year.
3. A signed agreement under this section shall satisfy the compulsory school
attendance requirements of section 167.031.
4. A qualified school or a provider of services purchased under this section shall not
share, refund, or rebate any Missouri empowerment scholarship account moneys with the
parent or qualified student in any manner.
5. If a qualified student withdraws from the program by enrolling in a school other
than a qualified school or is disqualified from the program under the provisions of section
166.710, the qualified student's Missouri empowerment scholarship account shall be closed
and any remaining funds shall be returned to the educational assistance organization for
redistribution to other qualified students. Under such circumstances, the obligation to provide
an education for such student shall transfer back to the student's district of residence.
6. Any funds remaining in a qualified student's Missouri empowerment scholarship
account at the end of a school year shall remain in the account and shall not be returned to the
educational assistance organization. Any funds remaining in a qualified student's Missouri
empowerment scholarship account upon graduation from a qualified school shall be returned
to the educational assistance organization for redistribution to other qualified students.
7. Moneys received under sections 166.700 to 166.720 shall not constitute Missouri
taxable income to the parent of the qualified student.
✔